Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1993.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 170 of Title 65, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For any county that funds a county library or metropolitan


library by a special levy approved by the voters pursuant to Section


10A of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution, the board of county


commissioners may reduce such levy by resolution. Provided, the


reduced special levy shall not be less than the minimum of one (1)


mill, as required pursuant to Section 10A of Article X of the


Oklahoma Constitution.





Req. No. 2873 Page 1


B. The resolution to reduce the special levy, as provided for


in subsection A of this section, shall include the following


information:


1. The current and proposed millage rate;


2. Findings that the proposed millage rate provides sufficient


funding for the library;


3. A determination that the reduction is in the best interests


of the taxpayers in the county; and


4. The effective tax year of the levy reduction.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2873 QD 1/15/2026 9:39:48 AM

























Req. No. 2873 Page 2